ro-RO: Materialul de căptușeală: Aer; Bumbac; Spumă; Gel; Materiale reciclate; Granule de cauciuc; Nisip; Rumeguș; Resturi textile; Apă; Altele
nb: Polstringsmateriale: Luft; Bomull; Skum; Gelé; Resirkulerte materialer; Gummigranulat; Sand; Sagflis; Tekstilrester; Vann; Annet
th: การเว้นขอบด้านวัสดุ: อากาศ; ฝ้าย; โฟม; เจล; วัสดุรีไซเคิล; เม็ดยาง; ทราย; ขี้เลื่อย; เศษผ้า; น้ำ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal za punjenje: Zrak; Pamuk; Pjena; Gel; Reciklirani materijali; Gumene granule; Pijesak; Piljevina; Ostaci tekstila; Voda; Ostalo
sk-SK: Materiál polstrovania: Vzduch; Bavlna; Pena; Gél; Recyklované materiály; Gumové granuly; Piesok; Piliny; Textilné odrezky; Voda; Iné
da: Pudemateriale: Luft; Bomuld; Skum; Gel; Genbrugsmaterialer; Gummigranulat; Sand; Savsmuld; Tekstilrester; Vand; Andet
ja: 余白素材: 空気; コットン; フォーム; ジェル; リサイクル素材; ゴム顆粒; 砂; おがくず; 布切れ; 水; その他
lt-LT: Paminkštinimo medžiaga: Oras; Medvilnė; Putplastis; Gelis; Perdirbtos medžiagos; Guminės granulės; Smėlis; Pjuvenos; Tekstilės atraižos; Vanduo; Kita
bg-BG: Материал на подплатата: Въздух; Памук; Пяна; Гел; Рециклирани материали; Гумени гранули; Пясък; Стърготини; Текстилни изрезки; Вода; Друго
pt-PT: material: Ar; Algodão; Espuma; Gel; Materiais reciclados; Grânulos de borracha; Areia; Serradura; Retalhos têxteis; Água; Outro
zh-CN: 缓冲材料: 空气; 棉; 泡沫; 凝胶; 回收材料; 橡胶颗粒; 沙子; 锯末; 碎布; 水; 其他
sv: Vadderingsmaterial: Luft; Bomull; Skum; Gel; Återvunnet material; Gummigranulat; Sand; Sågspån; Textilrester; Vatten; Övrigt
fi: Pehmustemateriaali: Ilma; Puuvilla; Vaahtomuovi; Geeli; Kierrätysmateriaalit; Kumirakeet; Hiekka; Sahanpuru; Tekstiilijäte; Vesi; Muu
ru: Материал набивки: Воздух; Хлопок; Пеноматериал; Гель; Переработанные материалы; Резиновые гранулы; Песок; Опилки; Текстильные обрезки; Вода; Другое
es: Material del acolchado: Aire; Algodón; Espuma; Gel; Materiales reciclados; Gránulos de goma; Arena; Aserrín; Restos de textiles; Agua; Otro
sl-SI: Material blazinjenja (polnila): Zrak; Bombaž; Pena; Gel; Reciklirani materiali; Gumijasti granulat; Pesek; Žagovina; Ostanki blaga; Voda; Drugo
cs: Materiál polstrování: Vzduch; Bavlna; Pěna; Gel; Recyklované materiály; Gumové granule; Písek; Piliny; Zbytky textilu; Voda; Jiné
pt-BR: Material do acolchoamento: Ar; Algodão; Espuma; Gel; Materiais reciclados; Grânulos de borracha; Areia; Serragem; Retalhos de tecido; Água; Outro
el: Υλικό επένδυσης: Αέρας; Βαμβάκι; Αφρός; Τζελ; Ανακυκλωμένα υλικά; Κόκκοι καουτσούκ; Άμμος; Πριονίδι; Κομμάτια υφάσματος; Νερό; Άλλο
it: Materiale dell'imbottitura: Aria; Cotone; Schiuma; Gel; Materiali riciclati; Granuli di gomma; Sabbia; Segatura; Scarti tessili; Acqua; Altro
vi: Vật liệu đệm: Khí; Cotton; Mút xốp; Gel; Vật liệu tái chế; Hạt cao su; Cát; Mùn cưa; Vải vụn; Nước; Khác
zh-TW: 襯墊材質: 空氣; 棉; 泡棉; 凝膠; 回收材料; 橡膠顆粒; 沙子; 鋸木屑; 碎布; 水; 其他
fr: Matière de remplissage ou de rembourrage: Air; Coton; Mousse; Gel; Matériaux recyclés; Granulés de caoutchouc; Sable; Sciure de bois; Chutes de textile; Eau; Autre
hu: Párnázóanyag: Levegő; Pamut; Hab; Gél; Újrahasznosított anyagok; Gumi granulátum; Homok; Fűrészpor; Textilhulladék; Víz; Egyéb
pl: Materiał wyściółki: Powietrze; Bawełna; Pianka; Żel; Materiały z recyklingu; Granulat gumowy; Piasek; Trociny; Ścinki tekstylne; Woda; Inne
tr: Dolgu malzemesi: Hava; Pamuk; Sünger; Jel; Geri dönüştürülmüş malzemeler; Kauçuk granüller; Kum; Talaş; Kumaş parçaları; Su; Diğer
en: Padding material: Air; Cotton; Foam; Gel; Recycled materials; Rubber granules; Sand; Sawdust; Textile scraps; Water; Other
nl: Vulmateriaal materiaal: Lucht; Katoen; Schuim; Gel; Gerecyclede materialen; Rubbergranulaat; Zand; Zaagsel; Textielresten; Water; Overig
ko: 패딩 소재: 공기; 면; 폼; 겔; 재활용 소재; 고무 과립; 모래; 톱밥; 천 조각; 물; 기타
de: Polstermaterial: Luft; Baumwolle; Schaumstoff; Gel; Recycelte Materialien; Gummigranulat; Sand; Sägemehl; Stoffreste; Wasser; Sonstige